Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-2307
Board of directors; qualifications; expenses; public meetings.

The corporation shall have a board of directors in which all powers of the corporation shall be vested and which shall consist of any number of directors, not less than three, all of whom shall be duly qualified electors of and taxpayers in the local political subdivision. The directors shall serve without compensation, except that they shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties under the Nebraska Industrial Development Corporation Act pursuant to sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The directors shall be elected by the governing body of the local political subdivision. Any meeting held by the board of directors for any purpose shall be open to the public.

Laws 1972, LB 1517, § 7;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 20;

Laws 1995, LB 494, § 7;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 16.